Massachusetts, session 194th, S2028.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 8 of Chapter 64H of the General Laws or any
general or special law or regulation to the contrary, including 830 CMR 64H,25,1(7), the
purchase of a motor vehicle, trailer, or other vehicle by a rental company as so defined in section
32E ½ of chapter 175 of the general laws shall not be considered an exempt use from the sales
tax at retail.
of 1